Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1714.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1361 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1361. When Provided.--(1) The board of school directors in any school district may, out of the funds of the district, provide for the free transportation of any resident pupil to and from the kindergarten, elementary school, or secondary school in which he is lawfully enrolled, provided that such school is not operated for profit and is located within the district boundaries or outside the district boundaries at a distance not exceeding ten miles by the nearest public highway, except that such ten-mile limit shall not apply to area career 1234567891011121314151617181920 and technical schools which regularly serve eligible district pupils or to special schools and classes approved by the Department of Education, and to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips for any purpose connected with the educational pursuits of the pupils. When provision is made by a board of school directors for the transportation of public school pupils to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided, the board of school directors shall also make identical provision for the free transportation of pupils who regularly attend nonpublic kindergarten, elementary and high schools not operated for profit to and from such schools or to and from any points within or without the Commonwealth in order to provide field trips as herein provided. Such transportation of pupils attending nonpublic schools shall be provided during regular school hours on such dates and periods that the nonpublic school not operated for profit is in regular session, according to the school calendar officially adopted by the directors of the same in accordance with provisions of law. The board of school directors shall provide such transportation whenever so required by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of Assembly.(2) The board of school directors in any school district may, if the board deems it to the best interest of the school district, for the purposes of transporting pupils as required or authorized by any of the provisions of this act or of any other act of the Assembly, appropriate funds for urban common carrier mass transportation purposes from current revenues to urban common carrier mass transportation authorities to assist the authorities to meet costs of operation, maintenance, capital 20250HB1714PN2107 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvements, and debt service. Said contributions shall not be subject to reimbursement by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations, including qualifications of school bus drivers, to govern the transportation of school pupils.(4) The board of school directors in any school district shall be prohibited from authorizing the transportation of pupils when the school entity in which the pupil is currently enrolled is located outside the boundary of this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1714PN2107 - 3 - 12345678910